Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2866.01
Pharmacist; supervision of pharmacy technicians and pharmacist interns.

(1) A pharmacist may supervise any combination of pharmacy technicians and pharmacist interns at any time up to a total of four people.

(2) A pharmacist intern shall be supervised at all times while performing the functions of a pharmacist intern which may include all aspects of the practice of pharmacy unless otherwise restricted. This subsection does not apply to a pharmacist intern who is receiving experiential training directed by the accredited pharmacy program in which he or she is enrolled.

(3) For any pharmacist supervising four pharmacy technicians, at least one individual shall be a certified pharmacy technician pursuant to section 38-2890.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 43;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB118, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 21.
April 15, 2026